Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. Department of Fire Prevention and Electrical Safety

Cross references. —

As to interstate compact for the prevention and control of forest fires, see §§

36-2-110

et seq.

Revision of article. —

Section 1, ch. 97, Laws 1983, revised this article, amending and renumbering former §§

35-9-101

to 35-9-140 as present §§

35-9-101

to

35-9-130

. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1983 act has been attempted, but historical citations to the former W.S. 1977 provisions have been added to the corresponding sections in this article. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.